Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-570
Class I, II, III, or IV school district; president; meetings; maintenance of order.

If at any district meeting of a Class I, II, III, or IV school district any person conducts himself or herself in a disorderly manner and persists in such conduct after notice by the president or person presiding, the president or person presiding may order such person to withdraw from the meeting and, if the person refuses, may order any person or persons to take such person into custody until the meeting is adjourned.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision IV, § 2, p. 345;

R.S.1913, § 6764;

C.S.1922, § 6305;

C.S.1929, § 79-402;

R.S.1943, § 79-402;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 92, p. 724;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 51;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-453;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 323;

Laws 2018, LB377, § 43;

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 50.